Tennessee, session 114, SB0429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 13, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) It is an offense to knowingly activate and point a laser pointer or other device
utilizing a laser beam at a person driving an automobile, boat, airplane, or other motor
vehicle.
(b) An offense under this section is a Class B misdemeanor.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to acts committed on or after that date.
SB0429
001598
- 1 -